Tennessee, session 114, SB1850.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-1-166, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(i) In determining whether placing a child in the custody of a relative caregiver,
as defined in § 37-1-186, is in the best interest of a child, the department shall not
require a relative caregiver to provide the child with the child's own bedroom, unless
there are specific safety or medical reasons that would make placement of the child with
another child unsafe.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 37-2-414, is amended by adding the
following as a new subsection:
(f) In determining whether placing a child in the custody of a relative for kinship
foster care, is in the best interest of a child, the department shall not require the relative
to provide the child with the child's own bedroom, unless there are specific safety or
medical reasons that would make placement of the child with another child unsafe.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1850
010566
- 1 -